Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Operator’s License

186.400.
Duties of Transportation Cabinet — Administration of laws.

The administration of the provisions of KRS

186.400

to

186.640

shall be vested in the Transportation Cabinet. The Transportation Cabinet may prescribe regulations for the enforcement of KRS

186.400

to

186.640

. The Transportation Cabinet also shall enforce regulations governing the acts of motor vehicle operators under KRS 186.400 to 186.640 and require reports which it deems necessary.

The cabinet shall provide or cause to be provided to appropriate persons or officials an adequate supply of forms for the administration of KRS

186.400

to

186.640

. The style of those forms and the method of their use shall be prescribed by the cabinet and shall be adequate to protect the safety interests of the state. The Transportation Cabinet shall prescribe the method of financial control.

The Transportation Cabinet shall collect all moneys due the state under KRS

186.531

for operators’ licenses and personal identification cards issued, and shall deposit those moneys with the state treasurer.

At least once each year the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall cause a reconciliation to be made between the record of receipts by the Transportation Cabinet and the receipt of applications by the Transportation Cabinet.

History.

2739m-55, 2739m-70: amend. Acts 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. X, § 11; 2020 ch. 51, § 1, effective March 27, 2020.

186.401.
Definitions of “driver’s license,” “operator’s license,” and “commercial driver’s license.”

As used in KRS

186.400

to

186.640

:

Driver’s license means an operator’s license issued pursuant to KRS

186.4102

,

186.412

, and

186.4121

;

“Operator’s license,” unless otherwise indicated, includes a motor vehicle operator’s license, a motorcycle operator’s license, and a combination motor vehicle-motorcycle license; and

Commercial driver’s license means a license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 281A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 27, effective July 13, 1990; 2017 ch. 100, § 12, effective January 1, 2019.

186.402.
Statement of legislative intent relating to young drivers.

It is the goal of the General Assembly to improve traffic safety and reduce traffic accident injuries and fatalities by controlling a young driver’s exposure and progressively moving the driver into more difficult driving experiences prior to full licensure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 198, § 1, effective October 1, 1996.

186.403.
Voluntary travel ID instruction permits, operator’s licenses, commercial driver’s licenses, and personal identification cards — Application — Fees — Issuance — Administrative regulations.

The Transportation Cabinet shall develop a system of issuing voluntary travel ID instruction permits, operator’s licenses, commercial driver’s licenses, and personal identification cards.

The development of the system identified in subsection (1) of this section shall include but not be limited to the:

Acquisition of equipment and information technology systems and services;

Modification, conversion, or upgrade of the cabinet’s existing databases, equipment, and information technology systems;

Establishment of electronic connectivity with any other state’s driver licensing department, federal agency, national or regional association, or business. Electronic connectivity under this paragraph shall be limited to the sharing of the minimum amount of information necessary to validate information supplied by an applicant, process the application, and produce and distribute the identity document. The Transportation Cabinet shall limit any access to the databases developed under this chapter in accordance with the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act, 18

U.S.C. sec. 2721

;

Creation of a new design for operator’s licenses, commercial driver’s licenses, instruction permits, and personal identification cards that will meet the minimum content, design, and security standards required under this section;

Collection, management, and retention of personal information and identity documents; and

Development and implementation of a comprehensive security plan to ensure the security and integrity of the department’s:

Employees;

Facilities;

Storage systems;

Production of operator’s licenses, commercial driver’s licenses, instruction permits, and personal identification cards; and

Collection and retention of personal information and identity documents.

On or after January 1, 2019:

A person who applies for an initial Kentucky instruction permit, operator’s license, or personal identification card under KRS 412,

186.4121

,

186.4122

, or

186.4123

, including any person who establishes residency in the state, may apply for either a voluntary travel ID or a standard instruction permit, operator’s license, or personal identification card;

A person who applies for the renewal of an instruction permit, operator’s license, or personal identification card under KRS 412,

186.4121

,

186.4122

, or

186.4123

may apply for either a voluntary travel ID or a standard instruction permit, operator’s license, or personal identification card; and

A person who holds a voluntary travel ID operator’s license, and applies for and passes all necessary examinations for a commercial driver’s license under KRS Chapter 281A, shall receive a voluntary travel ID commercial driver’s license. This paragraph shall not apply to a person who is not a citizen or permanent resident of the United States.

The fees for initial, renewal, duplicate, or corrected voluntary travel ID or standard operator’s licenses, instruction permits, or personal identification cards shall be as set forth under KRS

186.531

.

A voluntary travel ID identity document issued by the cabinet may be used for all state purposes authorized for identity documents otherwise issued under KRS

186.400

to

186.640

and Chapter 281A.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A that set standards for the establishment of a voluntary travel ID identity document system, including but not limited to the components of the system identified in subsection (2) of this section.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 100, § 10, effective June 29, 2017.

186.405.
Registration with United States Selective Service System — Duties of cabinet.

Any United States male citizen or immigrant who is at least eighteen (18) years of age but less than twenty-six (26) years of age shall be registered for the United States Selective Service System when applying to the Transportation Cabinet for the issuance, renewal, or duplicate copy of:

An operator’s license;

A commercial driver’s license; or

A personal identification card.

This registration is in compliance with federal Selective Service System requirements.

The Transportation Cabinet shall forward, in an electronic format, the necessary personal information required for registration of the applicants identified in this section to the Selective Service System via the American Association of Motor Vehicles Administrators Network. If an applicant declines registration, the Transportation Cabinet shall forward the necessary personal information to the Selective Service System with the notation that automatic registration was declined.

The applicant’s submission of the application shall serve as an indication that the applicant has already registered with the Selective Service System, or that he is authorizing the Transportation Cabinet to forward the necessary information for registration to the Selective Service System.

The Transportation Cabinet shall include the following statement on applications for licenses or identification cards described in this section: “By submitting this application, I am consenting to registration with the federal Selective Service System, if so required. If under eighteen (18) years of age, I understand that I will be registered as required by federal law when I attain eighteen (18) years of age.” In the event the applicant declines Selective Service registration, the cabinet may issue an operator’s license or personal identification card, but shall forward the necessary personal information to the Selective Service System.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 60, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 173, § 28, effective July 12, 2006.

186.410.
Operators’ licenses — Requirements and issuance — Personal identification cards, validity — Driver training programs — Application for travel ID or standard document.

Every person except those exempted by KRS

186.420

and

186.430

shall, before operating a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped upon a highway, secure an operator’s license as provided in this chapter.

Except as provided in KRS

186.4121

, all original, renewal, and duplicate personal identification cards and licenses for the operation of motor vehicles, motorcycles, or mopeds shall be applied for with the Transportation Cabinet, or through alternative technology, and issued by the Transportation Cabinet. Subject to the provisions of KRS

186.4101

, applications for renewal licenses and personal identification cards shall be made every eight (8) years within the birth month of the applicant. A license shall not be issued until the application has been certified by the cabinet and the applicant has, if required under KRS

186.635

, successfully completed the examinations required under KRS

186.480

.

All personal identification cards shall be issued under the provisions of KRS

186.4102

,

186.4122

, and

186.4123

.

A person under the age of eighteen (18) years who applies for an instruction permit shall, at any time between the age of sixteen (16) and before the person’s eighteenth birthday, enroll in one (1) of the following driver training programs:

A driver’s education course administered by a school district;

A driver training school licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 332 which offers a course meeting or exceeding the minimum standards established by the Transportation Cabinet; or

State traffic school. The person may seek to enroll in state traffic school before the person’s eighteenth birthday. Persons enrolling in state traffic school pursuant to this paragraph shall not be required to pay a fee.

Any applicant for any initial or renewal instruction permit, operator’s license, or personal identification card under KRS

186.400

to

186.640

may apply for either:

A voluntary travel ID document; or

A standard document that does not meet standards for federal identification purposes.

History.

2739m-34: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 79, § 1; 1946, ch. 127, § 1; 1948, ch. 208, §§ 1, 2, 3; 1958, ch. 60, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20 (7); 1978, ch. 349, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 434, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 389, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 267, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 198, § 3, effective October 1, 1996; 2000, ch. 535, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 264, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 173, § 29, effective July 12, 2006; 2017 ch. 100, § 1, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 2, effective March 27, 2020.

186.4101.
Renewal of license — Reconciliation of four-year and eight-year renewal periods.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a license to operate a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped, or a personal identification card shall be renewed every eight (8) years prior to its expiration. Except as provided in KRS

186.410

, a person seeking to renew an operator’s license shall apply to the cabinet in accordance with KRS

186.412

and

186.4121

.

An applicant for a renewal license, instruction permit, or identification card may choose to be issued a document that is valid for four (4) years. Fees for documents issued for a four (4) year period shall be adjusted in accordance with KRS

186.531

.

The fee to renew an operator’s license or personal identification card shall be according to the schedule set forth in KRS

186.531

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 38, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 267, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 100, § 13, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 3, effective March 27, 2020.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A person who operates a motor vehicle upon the highways of this state must have either a valid Kentucky operator’s license or a valid operator’s permit from another state; failure to possess either of the above mentioned operator’s licenses means that the person is in violation of KRS 186.620(2) if he operates a motor vehicle upon the highways of this state.

OAG 83-67

.

If a nonresident who has no Kentucky driver’s license, has had his license suspended or revoked by the issuing state, he then has no right to drive a motor vehicle upon the highways of Kentucky.

OAG 83-67

.

A moped operator must be licensed or face a $12 to $500 fine and six months in jail.

OAG 84-176

.

186.4102.
Photograph required for operator’s license, instructional permit, or personal identification card — Identification number — Age and organ donor designations — Voluntary travel ID identity document — When photograph not required.

Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, the Transportation Cabinet shall issue operator’s licenses and personal identification cards bearing a photograph of the applicant and other information the cabinet may deem appropriate to qualified applicants under this chapter. When taking the photograph, the applicant shall be prohibited from wearing sunglasses, veils, scarves, or any other attire that obscures or creates shadows upon any features of the applicant’s face as determined by the cabinet. An applicant shall be required to remove eyewear that obstructs the iris or the pupil of the eyes and shall not take any action to obstruct a photograph of his or her facial features. The face shall be visible from the crown to the base of the chin and from ear to ear. Any person who refuses to remove attire prohibited by this subsection as directed by the person taking the application shall be prohibited from receiving an operator’s license or personal identification card.

An operator’s license or personal identification card issued by the cabinet shall not contain the applicant’s Social Security number. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that develop a numbering system that uses an identification system other than Social Security numbers. If an applicant submits adequate proof that he or she does not have a Social Security number, the Transportation Cabinet shall assign the applicant a unique identifying number.

The license or personal identification card shall also designate by color coding and using the phrase “under 21” if the licensee or card holder is under the age of twenty-one (21); “CDL” if the license is issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 281A; or “under 21 CDL” if the licensee holds a commercial driver’s license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 281A and is under the age of twenty-one (21).

The cabinet shall provide on each operator’s license and personal identification card space for a notation that the holder of the license or personal identification card has expressed to the cabinet the person’s willingness to make an anatomical gift under KRS

311.1917

. If a person who has made a declaration under this subsection wishes to rescind that declaration, the person shall notify the Kentucky Circuit Court Clerks’ Trust for Life, which shall remove the notation from his or her records.

An operator’s license issued pursuant to this chapter shall be designated a Class D license.

A person shall not have more than one (1) operator’s license.

Upon marriage, dissolution of marriage, or any other qualifying event, if a person seeks to change his or her name, the person shall make a name change with the Social Security Administration prior to applying for an operator’s license or a personal identification card and shall provide the cabinet with the person’s marriage license, divorce decree, or other documentation. The name issued on the identity document shall match the person’s first and last name as recorded with the Social Security Administration. Unless a person is eligible to renew his or her identity document at the time of the name change, the fee charged under this section shall be for a corrected identity document as set forth in KRS

186.531

.

An identity document issued under this chapter shall contain a denotation that either:

The identity document is a voluntary travel ID identity document that complies with the security standards set forth by Pub. L. No. 109-13, Title II, and may be used for identification for federal purposes; or

The identity document shall not be used for federal identification purposes.

The Transportation Cabinet may provide for the issuance of an instruction permit, operator’s license, or personal identification card without a photograph if there is good cause for the omission based in documented religious objections. The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish the criteria and requirements for obtaining an operator’s license, instruction permit, or personal identification card without a photograph.

An applicant for an initial instruction permit, operator’s license, or personal identification card without a photograph shall apply to the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office. The application shall be processed solely by the Transportation Cabinet in the same manner as in KRS 186.4121(5) and 186.4123(8).

An operator’s license, instruction permit, or personal identification card issued without a photograph shall denote on its face that it shall not be accepted by any federal agency for identification or any other federal purpose.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 100, § 6, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 4, effective March 27, 2020.

186.411.
Issuance of driver’s license to person with a seizure condition — Conditions — Notice and hearing — Option for determination of ability by medical review board.

If a person with a seizure condition applies for an original, duplicate, modified, or renewal operator’s license, or applies for an instruction permit, he or she shall be required by the cabinet to present to the Division of Driver Licensing certification by a physician or advanced practice registered nurse that his or her condition is controlled by drugs, details of the drugs, dosages which the person takes, and that the person has been free of any seizures for ninety (90) days; his or her own statement that he or she has been free of any seizures for ninety (90) days before the date of the application, and that he or she is taking the medication prescribed by his physician or advanced practice registered nurse. The division shall upon receipt of the required documentation issue him a letter of authorization to present to the cabinet. The cabinet shall not issue an operator’s license to a person with a seizure condition who does not present the letter of authorization.

Any person who has a seizure condition who cannot present the certification that his or her condition is controlled by drugs or a statement that he or she has been seizure-free for ninety (90) days shall be notified in writing by the cabinet that the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle is withdrawn and of his or her right to have an informal hearing on the matter of whether he or she is an unsafe driver as a result of having the seizure condition. The notice shall be mailed by first-class mail to the address of record of the person. The hearing shall be automatically waived if not requested within twenty (20) days after the cabinet mails notice. The hearing shall be scheduled as early as practical after receipt of the request at a time and place designated by the cabinet.

A person whose seizure condition would impair his or her ability to operate a motor vehicle may present evidence of the condition to the Division of Driver Licensing’s medical review board as established under KRS

186.444

, including his or her own attested statement, physician’s or advanced practice registered nurse’s statement, and medical dosage details. If the board determines that the person’s seizure condition would not impair his or her ability to operate a motor vehicle, the division shall issue the letter of authorization required by subsection (1) of this section.

A person whose seizure condition is of a nature that the seizure condition would not impair the ability to operate a motor vehicle may present evidence of this fact to the Division of Driver Licensing including the person’s own attested statement, physician’s or advanced practice registered nurse’s statement, and medicine dosage details. If the division determines that the person’s seizure condition does not impair the ability to operate a motor vehicle, the division shall issue the letter of authorization required by subsection (1) of this section.

Any physician or advanced practice registered nurse shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability, absent a showing of bad faith, for providing any reports, records, examinations, opinions, or recommendations pursuant to this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 306, § 1; 1980, ch. 283, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 416, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 455, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 70, effective July 15, 1996; 2016 ch. 87, § 3, effective July 15, 2016; 2020 ch. 51, § 5, effective March 27, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by
1994 Ky. Acts chs. 416 and
455. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 416, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under
KRS

446.250

.

186.412.
Application of United States citizen or permanent resident for instruction permit or operator’s license — Information and documents required — Photograph — Scanning and retaining of application information — Temporary license or permit — Birth certificate — Oath.

As used in this section, “applicant” means a person who is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States.

An applicant shall apply for an instruction permit or operator’s license with the Transportation Cabinet, or through alternative technology. Except as provided in KRS

186.417

, the application form shall require the applicant’s:

Full legal name and signature;

Date of birth;

Social Security number or a letter from the Social Security Administration declining to issue a Social Security number;

Sex;

Present Kentucky resident address, exclusive of a post office box address alone;

Other information necessary to permit the application of United States citizens to also serve as an application for voter registration;

A brief physical description of the applicant;

Proof of the applicant’s Kentucky residency, including but not limited to a deed or property tax bill, utility agreement or utility bill, or rental housing agreement; and

Other information the cabinet may require by administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.

In addition to the information identified in subsection (2) of this section, a permanent resident shall present one (1) of the following documents issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services:

An I-551 card with a photograph of the applicant; or

A form with the photograph of the applicant or a passport with a photograph of the applicant on which the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, has stamped the following: “Processed for I-551. Temporary evidence of lawful admission for permanent residence. Valid until .... (Expiration Date). Employment authorized.”

Upon application for an operator’s license under this section, the cabinet shall capture a photograph of the applicant in accordance with the requirements of KRS 186.4102(1).

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the cabinet shall electronically scan the documents required for application under this section and shall electronically retain the application, supporting documents, and the photograph of the applicant. Upon completion of any required examinations under KRS

186.480

, the cabinet shall present the applicant with a temporary operator’s license or instruction permit, which shall be valid for thirty (30) days until a permanent operator’s license or instruction permit is mailed to the applicant by the Transportation Cabinet.

The cabinet shall only electronically scan the birth certificate of an individual applying for a voluntary travel ID instruction permit or operator’s license. If the applicant is not seeking such a permit or license, the cabinet shall not electronically scan the applicant’s birth certificate.

An applicant for an operator’s license or instruction permit shall not be required to surrender the applicant’s birth certificate for image capture, image storage, or image transmission to any entity, including the federal government, unless express consent is given by the applicant during the course of obtaining a voluntary travel ID license or permit.

An applicant shall swear an oath to the cabinet as to the truthfulness of the statements contained in the form.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 60, § 2; 1968, ch. 63, § 3; 1970, ch. 22, § 1; 1970, ch. 103, § 1; 1974, ch. 15, § 1, effective January 1, 1975; 1974, ch. 124, § 1; 1978, ch. 349, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 434, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 236, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 243, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 389, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 402, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 142, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 165, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 455, § 29, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 86, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 393, § 9, effective January 1, 1995; 1994, ch. 481, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 185, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 198, § 5, effective October 1, 1996; 1998, ch. 52, § 1, effective March 16, 1998; 1998, ch. 192, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 535, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 96, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 261, § 1, effective January 1, 2003; 2002, ch. 264, § 4, effective January 1, 2003; 2005, ch. 55, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 65, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 192, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 2, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2009, ch. 46, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 98, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 161, § 32, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 59, § 5, effective June 8, 2011; 2011, ch. 79, § 2, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 11, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 110, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2015 ch. 126, § 2, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 74, § 2, effective April 2, 2018; repealed and reenacted, 2017, ch. 100, § 2, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 6, effective March 27, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by
1994 Ky. Acts chs. 86,
393, and
481. Where these acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where Acts ch. 86 and 481 are in conflict, Acts ch. 481, which is the last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under
KRS

446.250

.
1994 Ky. Acts ch. 393 amending this section is effective January 1, 1995, according to

OAG 94-42

.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The word “reside” as used in this section means mere physical presence so that a person physically residing in Camp Breckinridge is, for purposes of this section, a resident of Union County, Kentucky, and may obtain a driver’s license by application to the circuit court of that county, even though Kentucky has ceded exclusive jurisdiction over Camp Breckenridge to the United States.

OAG 69-264

.

Since Hart County has no city of the second class, the circuit court clerk cannot legally authorize one of his deputies to sell motor vehicle operators’ licenses in some place other than the clerk’s office in the county seat.

OAG 69-670

.

The department of public safety (now transportation cabinet) may require an applicant for a driver’s license to give a social security number if such applicant has a number.

OAG 72-814

.

While a person seeking a driver’s license must apply in person to the Circuit Court clerk of the county in which he resides, a lawful deputy of the clerk can issue a license to the applicant in the applicant’s presence anywhere in the county in which his principal is circuit clerk as the deputy’s presence is the constructive presence of the circuit clerk, and there is no reference to the circuit clerk’s office as the exclusive site of issuance.

OAG 73-311

.

Although there is no specific statutory requirement that a social security number appear on the operator’s application for a driver’s license, there is no legal argument against such a disclosure, and it could be included with “such other information as necessary” that would be of help in identifying the person seeking a license to operate a motor vehicle.

OAG 73-490

.

Once the commission created by KRS

186.413

has decided on a process for the color photo processing of driver’s licenses, the commission need not be reconvened to pass on the renewal of or the letting of a new contract for such processing so long as the process chosen by the commission is complied with.

OAG 75-562

.

Unless a married woman has procured a court order under KRS

401.010

changing her name to something other than her husband’s surname, the woman must take the name of her husband in order to get a valid Kentucky driver’s license.

OAG 77-72

.

Acts 1978, chapter 434 as enrolled (without house amendment number 6) and signed by the presiding officers of both Houses and which became law without the Governor's signature represents the law on the question as enacted at the 1978 General Assembly.

OAG 78-283

.

There is no Kentucky law or regulation requiring a person to prove his age for a drivers license in any way other than by his own sworn statement.

OAG 80-145

.

The Circuit Court may lawfully require a person’s social security number in order for such person to obtain a driver’s license and such requirement does not violate the Federal Privacy Act.

OAG 82-494

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Money not to be drawn from Treasury unless appropriated — Annual publication of accounts — Certain revenues usable only for highway purposes, § 230.

Receipts of state moneys to be deposited in state treasury, KRS

41.070

.

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Comments, Equal Protection of the Sexes in Kentucky: The Effect of the Hummeldorf Decision on a Woman’s Right to Choose Her Surname, 9 N. Ky. L. Rev. 475 (1982).

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Minors, § 30.17.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Personal Rights and Privileges Resulting from Marriage, § 12.3.

186.4121.
Instruction permit or operator’s license application for non-United States citizen or permanent resident — Immigration status and personal identity documentation and verification — Renewal or duplicate license — Term of license.

As used in this section, “applicant” means a person who is not a United States citizen and has not been granted status as a permanent resident of the United States.

An applicant shall apply for an instruction permit or operator’s license to either the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office. An applicant under this section shall complete the application identified in KRS

186.412

, along with other documents required under this section. The cabinet shall keep an electronic copy of the documentation submitted with the application and shall capture a photograph of the applicant in accordance with KRS 186.4102(1).

The application form under this section shall be accompanied by the applicant’s documentation issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, authorizing the person to be in the United States and, if applicable, the applicant’s international driving permit. The Transportation Cabinet shall verify the information submitted under this subsection through the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements (SAVE) program.

The application form of a special status individual with a K-1 status shall be accompanied by an original or certified copy of the applicant’s completed marriage license signed by the official who presided over the marriage ceremony and two (2) witnesses. The application form of a special status individual with a K-1 status shall also include the applicant’s petition to enter the United States for the purpose of marriage that contains the name of the prospective spouse. If the name of the prospective spouse on the petition does not match the name of the spouse on the marriage license, the Transportation Cabinet shall not be required to issue an operator’s license.

The Transportation Cabinet shall verify and validate the immigration status and personal identity of an applicant under this section through federal government systems and databases.

If an applicant’s identity and immigration status is validated, the cabinet shall capture a photograph of the applicant, and scan the required documents into the cabinet’s database.

If the applicant successfully completes any examinations required under KRS

186.480

, or if an examination is not required, the Transportation Cabinet shall present the applicant with a temporary operator’s license or instruction permit, which shall be valid for thirty (30) days until a permanent operator’s license or instruction permit is mailed to the applicant.

An applicant under this section shall only be issued a standard operator’s license or instruction permit.

An applicant shall apply to renew an operator’s license, or obtain a duplicate operator’s license, at the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office.

If an applicant has any type of change in his or her immigration status, the applicant shall apply to update the operator’s license with either the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office within ten (10) days.

An applicant shall swear an oath to the Transportation Cabinet as to the truthfulness of the statements contained in the form.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an initial or renewal operator’s license issued to an applicant who is not a special status individual shall be valid for a period equal to the length of time the applicant’s documentation from the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, is valid, or eight (8) years, whichever time period is shorter.

An initial or renewal operator’s license shall be valid for a period of one (1) year if the applicant is not a special status individual and the person’s documentation issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, is issued for an indefinite period of time and does not have an expiration date. The fee shall be the same as for a regular operator’s license.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 100, § 3, effective January 1, 2019.